db/tsearch_data/dutch.affix
#
# FILE:    dutch96.aff (in 8bit ISO Latin1 character encoding!!)
#
# PURPOSE: affix file for new Dutch wordlist (according to spelling defined
# 	   in Groene Boekje 1996) for 8bit ispell version. (`Ispell -vv'
#	   should report `!NO8BIT (8BIT)'.)
#
#	   Derived from dutch.aff (version 1.4) of Arjan de Vet
#	   <devet@win.tue.nl> and improved for ISO Latin1 by Johan Vromans
#	   <jv@NL.net>. The current version is cross fertilized by ideas
#	   from deutsch.aff from Heinz Knutzen. The main changes with
#	   respect to 1.4 version are:
#          (1) improved (La)TeX interface
#          (2) improved interface for non-ASCII character encodings
#          (3) optimized affixes (number of words in the raw dictionary
#	       now reduced to about 50%)
#          (4) handling of apostroph (') and dash (-) in words
#          (5) some flag-names are renamed.
#
#	   For step (3) I wrote the PERL script affixes.pl.
#
# VERSION: 1.1 (22 Aug. 1997)
#      (1) Added missing stringchars in altstringtype's. Solved `Alternate
#          string character was already defined' messages and the problems
#          for codepage 432.
#      (2) Removed `plain TeX' altstringtype to keep within the default limit
#          of MAXSTRINGCHARS (100).
#      (3) Changed `latin1' defstringtype into "TeX" (was "nroff").
#
# AUTHOR:  Piet Tutelaers <rcpt@urc.tue.nl>
# VERSION: 1.0 (Aug. 1997)
#

defstringtype "latin1" "TeX" ".lat" ".iso"

bounderychars	\040	# space, in words like `Den Haag' (does not work yet)
wordchars	\047	# apostroph, in words like `baby'tje'
wordchars	\055	# dash, in words like `adjunct-chef'
wordchars	4	# in A4
wordchars	a	A
stringchar	à	À
stringchar	á	Á
stringchar	â	Â
stringchar	ä	Ä
wordchars	[b-c]	[B-C]
stringchar	ç	Ç
wordchars	[d-e]	[D-E]
stringchar	è	È
stringchar	é	É
stringchar	ê	Ê
stringchar	ë	Ë
wordchars	[f-i]	[F-I]
stringchar	ì	Ì
stringchar	í	Í
stringchar	î	Î
stringchar	ï	Ï
wordchars	[j-n]	[J-N]
stringchar	ñ	Ñ
wordchars	[o]	[O]
stringchar	ò	Ò
stringchar	ó	Ó
stringchar	ô	Ô
stringchar	ö	Ö
wordchars	[p-u]	[P-U]
stringchar	ù	Ù
stringchar	ú	Ú
stringchar	û	Û
stringchar	ü	Ü
wordchars	[v-z]	[V-Z]

#
# TeX/LaTeX with dutch babel macro's. (Repeat all stringchar definitions
# from the latin1 section. Otherwise you will get strange behaviour.)
#
altstringtype "tex" "TeX" ".tex" ".bib"

altstringchar	\\\`a	à
altstringchar	\\\'a	á
altstringchar	\\\^a	â
altstringchar	\"a	ä
altstringchar	\\c{c}	ç
altstringchar	\\\`e	è
altstringchar	\\\'e	é
altstringchar	\\\^e	ê
altstringchar	\"e	ë
altstringchar	\\\`i	ì
altstringchar	\\\'i	í
altstringchar	\\\^i	î
altstringchar	\"i	ï
altstringchar	\\\~n	ñ
altstringchar	\\\`o	ò
altstringchar	\\\'o	ó
altstringchar	\\\^o	ô
altstringchar	\"o	ö
altstringchar	\\\`u	ù
altstringchar	\\\'u	ú
altstringchar	\\\^u	û
altstringchar	\"u	ü
altstringchar	\"U	Ü

#
# MSDOS codepage 437.
#
altstringtype "cp437" "TeX" ".pc" ".txt"

altstringchar   \205    à
altstringchar   \240    á
altstringchar   \203    â
altstringchar   \204    ä
altstringchar   \207    ç
altstringchar   \212    è
altstringchar   \202    é
altstringchar   \210    ê
altstringchar   \211    ë
altstringchar   \215    ì
altstringchar   \241    í
altstringchar   \214    î
altstringchar   \213    ï
altstringchar   \244    ñ
altstringchar   \225    ò
altstringchar   \242    ó
altstringchar   \223    ô
altstringchar   \224    ö
altstringchar   \227    ù
altstringchar   \243    ú
altstringchar   \226    û
altstringchar   \201    ü
altstringchar   \232    Ü

#
# Plain TeX macro's. There are currently two problems:
#  (1) they don't work as expected. For example the word `barri\"{e}re'
#      is not recognized as `barri"ere' but as two separate words.
#  (2) Give error message `Too many stringchar definitions' with the
#      default of MAXSTRINGCHARS (100).
#
#altstringtype "tex" "TeX" ".tex"
#
#altstringchar	\\\"{a}	ä
#altstringchar	\\\"{e}	ë
#altstringchar	\\\"\\{i}	ï
#altstringchar	\\\"{o}	ö
#altstringchar	\\\"{u}	ü
#altstringchar	\\\"{U}	Ü
#altstringchar	\\\'a	á
#altstringchar	\\\'e	é
#altstringchar	\\\'i	í
#altstringchar	\\\'o	ó
#altstringchar	\\\'u	ú
#altstringchar	\\\^a	â
#altstringchar	\\\^e	ê
#altstringchar	\\\^i	î
#altstringchar	\\\^o	ô
#altstringchar	\\\^u	û
#altstringchar	\\\`a	à
#altstringchar	\\\`e	è
#altstringchar	\\\`i	ì
#altstringchar	\\\`o	ò
#altstringchar	\\\`u	ù
#altstringchar	\\\~n	ñ
#altstringchar	\\c{c}	ç

#
# The prefix table.
#
prefixes

flag *A:
   .		>	AAN		# maken		> aanmaken

flag *B:
   .		>	BE		# valling	> bevalling

flag *C:
   .		>	IN		# breek		> inbreek

flag *F:
   .		>	AF		# maken		> afmaken

flag *G:
   .		>	GE		# roepen	> geroepen

flag *K:
   .		>	OP		# drinken	> opdrinken

flag *O:
   .		>	ON		# geldig	> ongeldig

flag *U:
   .		>	UIT		# schakelen	> uitschakelen

flag *V:
   .		>	VER		# spreken	> verspreken

#
# The suffix table.
#
suffixes

#
# Diminitiva (-tje, -tjes, 'tje and -'tjes words).
#
flag J:
   [AEIOU] [AEIOU]	>	TJE	# bui		> buitje
   [AEIOU] [AEIOU]	>	TJES	# bui		> buitjes
   [^AEIOU] A		>	ATJE    # opa		> opaatje
   [^AEIOU] A		>	ATJES	# opa		> opaatjes
   [^AEIOU] I		>	ETJE    # ski		> skietje
   [^AEIOU] I		>	ETJES   # ski		> skietjes
   [^AEIOU] Y		>	'TJE	# baby		> baby'tje
   [^AEIOU] Y		>	'TJES	# baby		> baby'tjes
   [^AEIOU] O		>	OTJE    # auto		> autootje
   [^AEIOU] O		>	OTJES   # auto		> autootjes
   [^AEIOU] U		>	UTJE    # accu		> accuutje
   [^AEIOU] U		>	UTJES   # accu		> accuutjes
   [AEIOU]  [LNRW]	>       TJE	# lepel		> lepeltje
					# paal		> paaltje
					# kuur		> kuurtje
					# duw		> duwtje
   [AEIOU]  [LNRW]	>       TJES	# lepel		> lepeltjes
   [AEIOU]  M		>       PJE	# bezem		> bezempje
   [AEIOU]  M		>       PJES	# bezem		> bezempjes
   [AEIOU]  [BCDFGKPT]	>       JE	# club		> clubje
   [AEIOU]  [BCDFGKPT]	>       JES	# club		> clubjes

#
# Nouns and verbs ending on -en and -n.
#
flag N:
   [^E]		>	EN		# wiel		> wielen
   [E]		>	N		# made		> maden

flag M:
   B		>	BEN		# web		> webben
   D		>	DEN		# wad		> wadden
   F		>	FEN		# mof		> moffen
   G		>	GEN		# trog		> troggen
   K		>	KEN		# tak		> takken
   L		>	LEN		# hal		> hallen
   M		>	MEN		# kam		> kammen
   N		>	NEN		# ven		> vennen
   P		>	PEN		# map		> mappen
   R		>	REN		# nar		> narren
   S		>	SEN		# bos		> bossen
   T		>	TEN		# bot		> botten
   Z		>	ZEN		# fez		> fezzen

flag Z:
   A A F	>	-AF,VEN		# raaf		> raven
   A A S	>	-AS,ZEN		# daas		> dazen
   E E F	>	-EF,VEN		# zeef		> zeven
   E E S	>	-ES,ZEN		# frees		> frezen
   E I S	>	-S,ZEN		# reis		> reizen
   E U S	>	-S,ZEN		# reus		> reuzen
   I E F	>	-F,VEN		# brief		> brieven
   I E S	>	-S,ZEN		# kies		> kiezen
   I J F	>	-F,VEN		# lijf		> lijven
   I J S	>	-S,ZEN		# prijs		> prijzen
   O E F	>	-F,VEN		# schroef	> schroeven
   O E S	>	-S,ZEN		# hoes		> hoezen
   O O F	>	-OF,VEN		# roof		> roven
   O O S	>	-OS,ZEN		# doos		> dozen
   U I F	>	-F,VEN		# druif		> druiven
   U I S	>	-S,ZEN		# huis		> huizen
   U U S	>	-US,ZEN		# refuus	> refuzen
   [^AEIJOU] F	>	-F,VEN		# korf		> korven
   [^AEIJOU] S	>	-S,ZEN		# vers		> verzen
   H E I D	>	-ID,DEN	        # domheid	> domheden
