db/tsearch_data/dutch.dict
aanzienlijk/EHNORT
accentverschil/M
actiepunt/N
afbraakprijs/Z
afplof/MW
afzonder/INW
albatros/M
alledaagse/O
baktrog/M
bankbiljet/JM
bankbrief/JZ
barbierde/GN
bedrukte/NOR
bekwame/NO
beleidsdocument/N
beredeneerd/ENORT
beslecht/EIMNOW
bestaansmogelijkheid/Z
beteren/ADGV
bevolkingsvraagstuk/M
beweeglijkst/EO
bidt/AFV
bik/AFMUW
blaas/ACFGKUZ
blies/ACFKUZ
blokte/FGN
bochtscharnier/N
bodem/JNSVW
boedel/CJS
boks/KNW
bond/ABCFKNV
borst/CN
borstelde/FGKNU
bracht/ACFGKNU
brand/ACFGIKMNUVW
brandstof/M
brillendoos/Z
brokkelt/CFUV
buisde/GN
ceel/JP
collegiaal/O
compleetst/C
consolideerde/GN
cricket/GMNW
dampende/U
dauwde/BGN
deelt/BCFKUV
depotfractiebewijs/Z
dienares/M
diende/ABCFGKNUV
dienen/ABCDFKUV
dikten/ACGV
doen/ACFIKUV
dokte/FGKN
doorschijnend/EORT
doorschreef/Z
dorpsplein/N
dotters/B
douceur/JS
draag/ABCFGKPUV
draaien/ACDFKUV
dreven/ABCFGKUV
drong/ACFKNV
dubbelden/GV
dunde/GNUV
duvelt/BK
duwen/ACFKUV
dweilde/AFGKNU
eicel/M
eins/Z
examen/JS
fietsen/ADF
flikte/GKN
fluisterde/CGN
fopt/EGN
fouilleerde/GN
frommelden/GV
fuif/JVZ
garantiebewijs/Z
geacht/ENO
gebikt/EFNU
gebouwde/ACFKNOU
gedaan/ACFKOU
gedamde/ACFN
gediend/ACEFKNU
gedreigde/FN
gefrankeerd/ENO
gegenereerd/EN
gegoten/ACFKU
gegrinnikt/A
gehangen/ACEFKNU
geharkte/AFKN
geklaard/CEFKNU
geknipte/AFNU
gekoekt/A
gekuist/EFKNO
gelapt/ACEFKN
gelijknamige/O
geluchte/KNU
gelukspop/M
gemaakte/ACFKNORU
gemelde/AFN
gemotiveerd/EHNO
geperst/ACEFKNU
geplakte/ACFKN
geprevaleerd/EN
gepuft/U
geranseld/EFN
gerechtvaardigd/ENO
gericht/ACEFHKOU
geschort/K
geschoven/ACFKU
geschrabde/FNU
geschuind/AF
gesneden/ACFKU
gestaan/ACFKU
gestegen/CFKU
gestoofd/EFKN
gestoten/ACFKU
gestuurd/ACEFKNU
getekende/ACFKNOU
gevallen/ACEFKNOU
gevijzeld/EKN
gevlekte/FN
gevoeligheid/OZ
gevuurd/AEFN
gewaaide/ACFKNU
gewonnen/ACFU
gezante/FN
gezochtst/EOU
gietsels/F
giften/AUV
glimmen/ADV
goede/CGNV
gooiden/CFGKUV
gooit/CFKUV
grazen/BF
griend/EGN
groen/EHJNRT
groothandelsprijs/Z
gruisden/GV
hangen/ABCDFGKUV
hard/AEGHIMNRTVW
heer/BJPST
hef/AFKMV
hemdsmouw/N
herformuleerde/GN
herschreef/Z
heusheden/O
hingen/ABFKUV
hommer/JS
houden/ABCDFGKUV
houdende/ABCF
hovaardig/EHRTV
huppelen/AD
inkomstenbron/M
instelmogelijkheid/Z
jaag/ABCFKPVW
jaaropgave/N
jou/G
kameel/JP
kattenras/M
keer/BCFJPUVW
kieken/JS
kiesschijf/Z
kijken/ABCDFKUV
kissebist/EGN
kladder/BNSW
klap/BCFGKMVW
klaringen/CKUV
kleedden/ABCFKUV
klemmen/ABCDF
klets/FGNUW
klipgeit/N
kocht/ABCFGKNUV
koet/JNST
kogelde/BGN
kolbak/MS
kombuis/Z
kookt/CEFGKNUV
kopen/ABCFKUV
kortte/BCFKNV
krabbelden/BFGK
krabden/BFGU
kregen/AFGV
krompen/BCGV
krop/KMNVW
kruimel/FIJNSVW
kwaakt/EGN
ladingsbrief/Z
lanceerde/GN
lastpak/M
lees/BCFKUVZ
leesbare/O
legden/ABCFGKUV
leger/BCIJNSW
legger/ABCFKSU
leid/BCFGIKMNUVW
leiding/ACFGKNUV
liefdeslied/J
liegt/BF
lijkkleurige/GR
loerde/ABFN
lompigheid/Z
loos/HUZ
luchtten/KUV
maanbrieven/V
maanden/AGV
mat/ABCEFGHJKMNSTUVW
matrozenbak/M
matse/NS
meenden/GV
mevrouw/JNW
middenprijs/Z
moeial/BM
nathals/Z
neep/FPU
neergezet/MNW
nekt/EGN
neukt/EGNV
nijpt/FU
oester/JS
omstreden/O
onbedachtzaamheid/Z
ontwel/DMW
oordeel/BPVW
openluchtspel/N
overheidsbedrijf/Z
paar/DJOPSW
pak/ABCFJKMUVW
pakken/ABCDFKUV
pamflet/JM
passende/AKR
pastinakenbed/M
patrouilleerde/GN
persten/ACFGKU
piccolo/J
pierebad/N
polariseerde/GN
portaal/JP
potte/GKNV
prijs/AFZ
prijst/AF
pruimtabak/M
purperde/GN
raadde/ABFNV
ranonkel/JS
rasp/FNW
ravenaas/Z
reiken/ABDFUV
reikhalsde/GN
rekenden/ABCFGUV
rekent/ABCFUV
rijgen/ACF
rijpen/AB
roeide/AFKNU
roep/ABCFGIKNU
roskamde/GN
rubriek/JN
ruk/ACFKMUVW
samengroei/NW
schadelijkst/EO
schatting/CFN
scheiding/FNU
schenen/BFGUV
scherpt/ACEGKNV
schiet/ABCFIKNUV
schikking/BNV
schildersperspectief/Z
schilferden/FGV
schoppen/ACFSUV
schotel/JNSW
schrijf/ABCFGKUVZ
schudde/FGKNUV
schuld/CNOU
sjor/AKMW
slagen/ABCDFGKUV
slapt/EGNV
sleutelstuk/M
slijterij/N
slik/CMVW
slok/CJKMNW
sluiting/ACFKNUV
sneed/ABCFKPUV
snorde/ABFKN
snuffel/BFNW
sopte/CFGNU
spartel/GINW
spiraal/JP
spons/FNWZ
spreekbuis/Z
spreken/ABCDFUV
sproeide/BGN
sta/ABCDFJKUV
standen/BFKV
steekpan/M
stemopneming/N
sterft/ABEFUV
stijfde/AGKNV
stoelde/GNUV
stool/JP
stoomden/ACFGKU
stootte/ACFKNUV
stop/ACFKMNSV
strikt/AEGHNRTV
stuift/ABCFKV
stuiven/ABCFKV
takelden/AFGKV
teerde/BCFGKNOUV
tekenpen/M
tellen/ADFKUV
tenant/N
thyrs/Z
tien/DJN
tikte/ACFGNV
tilbaar/O
toon/ABJPVW
toonde/ABGNV
trapte/ABCFGNUV
trouwt/BCUV
tuba/J
tussenstap/M
uitbuit/IMNW
vaar/ABCFGJKPSUVW
vat/ABGKMNVW
vegen/AFKU
veilig/BEHORT
verachteloos/DZ
verantwoordelijke/NOR
vereelt/EIMNW
vergetelijkst/EO
verlovingsring/N
vermogende/OR
verzettelijk/O
vijst/ACFK
violier/JN
visualiseerde/GN
vlaggenstok/M
vocaties/C
vochtig/BEHRT
voeder/KNVW
voorbereiding/N
voorschreef/Z
vouwbaar/KU
vrijwilliger/EOS
vroren/BCFGUV
wandelden/ABFG
wasbak/FM
weegt/BCFKUV
wei/DGJNW
werd/GNV
werkelijk/BEHOV
werkvrouw/N
wezen/ABFGHJSUV
wijndruif/Z
wonend/CENU
woning/BCN
zakt/ABCEFGKNUV
zandt/ABFV
zeeg/FPU
zeepok/M
zeept/CEFGNV
zelfstandige/NOR
zij/DKW
zinksels/B
zweefde/AFN
zwem/ACFMN
zwendelt/BV
zwerft/F
